apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="/anar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aniríem</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniria</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniríeu</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniries</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anirien</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniria</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anirem</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniré</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anireu</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniràs</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aniran</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anirà</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anàssim</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anàs</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anàssiu</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anassis</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anassin</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>anàs</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anant</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anant</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anàrem</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>aní</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anàreu</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anares</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anaren</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anà</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anem</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anam</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anem</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anam</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aneu</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anau</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aneu</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anau</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vés</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vés</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>vagin</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>vagen</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>vagin</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>vagen</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>vagi</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>vaja</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>vagi</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>vaja</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anar</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anar</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anàvem</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anava</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anàveu</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anaves</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anaven</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anava</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anéssim</l>  <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anàrem</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anés</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anara</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anéssiu</l>  <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anàreu</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anessis</l>  <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anares</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anessin</l>  <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anaren</l>   <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>anés</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>anara</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anades</l>    <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anada</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anats</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anat</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>anem</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anam</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>vam</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>vàrem</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>vaig</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aneu</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>anau</l>      <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>vau</l>       <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>vàreu</l>     <r>anar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="anar a la seua" v="val"><i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>la<b/>seua</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>la<b/>seua</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar a la seva" v="cat"><i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>la<b/>seva</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>la<b/>seva</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar a escola">   <i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>escola</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>escola</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar a fer gresca"><i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>fer<b/>gresca</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>fer<b/>gresca</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar a pams">     <i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>pams</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>pams</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar a pic">      <i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>pic</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>pic</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar d'allò més bé"><i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'allò<b/>més<b/>bé</l><r><g><b/>d'allò<b/>més<b/>bé</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar de cap per avall"><i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>cap<b/>per<b/>avall</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>cap<b/>per<b/>avall</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar fent">       <i></i><par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fent</l><r><g><b/>fent</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="anar de">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>de</l><r><j/>de<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="anar de">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/><a/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar amb compte"> <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>amb<b/>compte</l><r><g><b/>amb<b/>compte</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="anar d'">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'</l><r><j/>de<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="anar d'">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>d'</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="anar de">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><j/>de<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR" lm="anar de">  <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar plegats">    <par n="/anar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>plegats</l><r><g><b/>plegats</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="anar">            <par n="/anar__vblex"/></e>
